New Jersey, session 222, S82.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  A taxpayer owning property within 1,000 feet of Barnegat Bay and its tributaries, as defined by the Division of Taxation in consultation with the Department of Environmental Protection, shall be entitled to claim a recurring annual credit of $250 against the State tax otherwise due under the "New Jersey Gross Income Tax Act," N.J.S.54A:1-1 et seq., for replacing all grass lawns on the taxpayers property with stones, crushed shells or other similar materials that require no maintenance from fertilizers, liming materials, insecticides, pesticides, herbicides or other chemical agents that could eventually flow into Barnegat Bay. The annual tax credit shall also be available to eligible property owners who have replaced grass lawns in the manner described in this section prior to the effective date of this act. b.    The Director of the Division of Taxation shall adopt, in accordance with the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), rules and regulations necessary to effectuate the provisions of this act. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately and apply to taxable years beginning January 1 next occurring after the effective date of this act.